Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-309
Discriminatory housing practice, defined.

Discriminatory housing practice shall mean an act that is unlawful under section 20-318, 20-319, 20-320, 20-321, or 20-344.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 10.